District of Columbia statutes.
31-5031.15

Prohibition of rebate and fee splitting.

A title insurer or other person shall not give or receive, directly or indirectly, any consideration for the referral of title insurance business or escrow or other service provided by a title insurer.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2156, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2156 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).